Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 7

Discharge from Inpatient Treatment

33-6-701. Review of admitted persons to determine eligibility for discharge.

The chief officer of a public or private hospital shall, as often as practicable, but not less often than every six (6) months, examine or cause to be examined each person admitted under this title for treatment of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance. If the chief officer determines on the basis of the examination that the person is eligible for discharge under § 33-6-602, § 33-6-705 or § 33-6-706, and that the discharge is not subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708, the chief officer shall order the immediate release of the person and shall notify the person upon whose application the person was admitted and, if the person was involuntarily hospitalized, the court that ordered the hospitalization.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 46; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 18; 1982, ch. 862, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A., § 33-609; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 63; T.C.A., § 33-6-108(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-6-702. Request for current examination of mental condition — Payment.

Any person hospitalized under a court order obtained under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, or the person's attorney, parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse or adult next of kin, shall be entitled, upon the expiration of ninety (90) days following the order and not more frequently than every six (6) months thereafter, to request, in writing, the chief officer of the hospital in which the person is hospitalized to have a current examination of the person's mental condition made by one (1) or more physicians. If the request is timely, it shall be granted. The person shall be entitled at the person's own expense to have a licensed physician not connected with the hospital to participate in the examination. If the person is indigent, is in a department facility, and makes a written request for examination, with the approval of the commissioner, the department shall assist the person in obtaining a licensed physician to participate in the examination in the person's behalf. A physician so obtained by the indigent person shall be compensated for services out of unobligated funds of the department in an amount the department determines to be fair and reasonable.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 46; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 18; 1982, ch. 862, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A., § 33-609; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 63; T.C.A., § 33-6-108(b)(1); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-703. Discharge of person eligible for release — Petition for review where one (1) or more physicians finds admission no longer needed.

If, after considering the reports of the physicians and other relevant information, the chief officer determines that the person is eligible for discharge under § 33-6-602, § 33-6-705 or § 33-6-706 and that the discharge is not subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708, the chief officer shall order the immediate release of the person and notify the committing court. If one (1) or more of the physicians participating in the examination reports that the person no longer meets the standards under which the person was admitted, the person may petition the court that ordered the hospitalization for an order directing the person's release. The person shall be apprised of the results of the examination reports and shall be furnished true copies of them, which shall accompany the person's petition.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 46; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 18; 1982, ch. 862, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A., § 33-609; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 63; T.C.A., § 33-6-108(b)(2); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-704. Procedure for reviewing petition.

In considering the petition, the court shall consider the testimony of the physicians who participated in the examination of the person and their reports accompanying the petition. After considering the testimony and reports, the court shall either:

Reject the petition and order the continued hospitalization of the person; or

Order the immediate release of the person.

Any physician participating in the examination shall be a competent and compellable witness at any judicial proceeding held under this title.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 46; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 18; 1982, ch. 862, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A., § 33-609; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 63; T.C.A., § 33-6-108(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-6-705. Discharge of person no longer meeting standards for admission.

IF

a person was admitted to a hospital for treatment of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance under any provision of this title other than chapter 6, part 5 of this title, AND

the person no longer meets the standards under which the admission took place, AND

the person's detention is not otherwise authorized under the part under which the person was admitted,

THEN

the person shall be discharged.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 3; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 18, 19; T.C.A., § 33-614; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 18; T.C.A., § 33-6-109(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-706. Discharge of involuntarily committed person — Person no longer mentally ill or in remission — Person unlikely to cause harm — Voluntary outpatient treatment possible.

IF

a person was committed involuntarily under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, AND

the person does not have a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, OR

the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in remission, AND

the person does not pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501, OR

the person would pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment is continued, AND

voluntary outpatient treatment is a suitable less drastic alternative to commitment because the person is likely to participate in outpatient treatment without being legally obligated to do so,

THEN

IF

the person is not subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708,

THEN

the person shall be discharged, AND

IF

the person is subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708,

THEN

the person shall be discharged in conformity with § 33-6-708.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 3; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 18, 19; T.C.A., § 33-614; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 18; T.C.A., § 33-6-109(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-707. Persons eligible for discharge subject to mandatory outpatient treatment.

IF

a person was committed involuntarily under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, AND

the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in remission, AND

the person would pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment continues, AND

voluntary outpatient treatment is not a suitable less drastic alternative to commitment because the person is not likely to participate in outpatient treatment without being legally obligated to do so,

THEN

the person is eligible for discharge only under § 33-6-602.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 3; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 18, 19; T.C.A., § 33-614; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 18; T.C.A., § 33-6-109(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-708. Discharge procedure for involuntarily committed persons.

If a person is committed involuntarily by a criminal or juvenile court under chapter 6, part 5 of this title and the court determines at the time of commitment that, due to the nature of the person's criminal conduct that created a serious risk of physical harm to other persons, the person should not be discharged from the commitment without proceedings under this section to review eligibility for discharge under §§ 33-6-602, 33-6-705 and 33-6-706, the hospital shall proceed under this section to effect discharge from the commitment.

Any person who was committed involuntarily on the basis of mental illness between April 23, 1980, and July 1, 1982, and who was subject to the discharge procedures of former § 33-313 during that period is subject to discharge only under the procedures of subdivisions (c)(1)-(5).

When the chief officer determines that the person is eligible for discharge under § 33-6-602, § 33-6-705 or § 33-6-706, the chief officer shall notify the committing court of that conclusion, of the basis for it, and, if discharge is under § 33-6-602, of the outpatient treatment plan approved by the releasing facility and the qualified mental health professional for the person. The determination by the chief officer shall create a rebuttable presumption of its correctness. The clerk shall send a copy of that complete notice and plan to the person's counsel and to the district attorney general for the jurisdiction in which the committing court is located. The court may, on its own motion or that of the district attorney general, order a hearing to be held within twenty-one (21) days of the receipt of the chief officer's notice. The court shall send notice of the hearing to the person, the chief officer, the person's counsel, the person's next of kin, and the district attorney general.

If the court does not set a hearing and notify the chief officer within fifteen (15) days of its receipt of the chief officer's notice, the chief officer shall release the person from involuntary commitment under § 33-6-602, § 33-6-705 or § 33-6-706, as appropriate.

If the court sets a hearing, the hearing shall be held within twenty-one (21) days of the court's receipt of notice from the chief officer. The person shall attend the hearing, unless the person's presence is waived in writing by counsel before the hearing. If the person does not have counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the person throughout the proceedings and any appeal. The person's counsel shall advocate for the least drastic alternative to commitment, unless directed otherwise by the person. Compensation of appointed counsel for the person shall be pursuant to Tennessee Rules of the Supreme Court, Rule 15.

Following the hearing, if the court finds by clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence that the person is not eligible for discharge under § 33-6-602, § 33-6-705 or § 33-6-706, it shall order the person's return to the hospital under the original commitment. If the court finds otherwise, it shall order the person's release from involuntary commitment in accordance with the recommendations of the chief officer.

The district attorney general on behalf of the state or the person may file a notice of appeal of a final adjudication under this section to the court of criminal appeals.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-314; Acts 1985, ch. 437, §§ 19, 20; 1986, ch. 836, § 6; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1, 2, 5; T.C.A., § 33-6-110; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former T.C.A. § 33-313 is now compiled as part of § 33-5-410.